Oklahoma, session 2025, SB250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 250 Page 1

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 40 O.S. 2021, Section 197.16, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 197.16. A. To compute the minimum wage of any employee
coming within the purview of this act the Oklahoma Minimum Wage Act,
credit toward the minimum required wage must shall be given for any
tips or gratuities, meals, or lodging received by the employee up to
but not exceeding fifty percent (50%) of said wage provided that the
employer pays a cash wage of not less than what is required under 29
C.F.R., Section 531.50(a)(1).
B. To compute the minimum wage of any employee coming within
the purview of the Oklahoma Minimum Wage Act should the minimum wage
exceed the current federal minimum wage, credit toward the minimum
required wage may be given for any tips or gratuities, meals, or
lodging received by the employee.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025."
Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of May, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House of
Representatives

Passed the Senate the ____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
ENGR. H. A. to ENGR. S. B. NO. 250 Page 2

ENGR OSSED SENATE
BILL NO. 250 By: Thompson of the Senate

and

Duel of the House


An Act relating to the Oklahoma Minimum Wage Act;
amending 40 O.S. 2021, Section 197.16, which relates
to tips, gratuities, meals, or lodging; updating
statutory reference; allowing for alternate
computation for wage under certain conditions;
updating statutory language; and providing an
effective date.


BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 40 O.S. 2021, Section 197.16, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 197.16. A. To compute the minimum wage of any employee
coming within the purview of this act the Oklahoma Minimum Wage Act,
credit toward the minimum required wage must shall be given for any
tips or gratuities, meals, or lodging received by the employee up to
but not exceeding fifty percent (50%) of said the wage.
B. To compute the minimum wage of any employee coming within
the purview of the Oklahoma Minimum Wage Act should the minimum wage
exceed the current federal minimum wage, credit toward the minimum
required wage may be given for any tips or gratuities, meals, or
lodging received by the employee.
ENGR. S. B. NO. 250 Page 1

SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the Senate the 12th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives














ENGR. S. B. NO. 250 Page 2